Maine, session 132, LD1590.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §8003-H, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 642, §3, is further
amended to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 951 or Title 32 to the contrary, except as
otherwise provided in section 7054-A and section 13857, subsection 2, paragraph C, that
pertains to the regulatory functions of the Office of Professional and Occupational
Regulation, referred to in this section as "the office," or that governs the licensing boards
and commissions within the office, the office, including the licensing boards and
commissions within the office, shall establish a process to issue a license by endorsement
to an applicant who presents proof of licensure by another jurisdiction of the United States
as long as the other jurisdiction maintains substantially equivalent license requirements for
the licensed profession or occupation and as long as:
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §8003-H, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 167, §10 and c. 289,
§1, is amended to read:
The Except as otherwise provided in section 7054-A and section 13857, subsection 2,
paragraph C, the office, or a licensing board or commission within the office, may require
an applicant to pass a jurisprudence examination if such an examination is required to be
passed for licensure pursuant to law or rule of the office, licensing board or commission.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §7054-A, first ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. V, §9, is
further amended to read:
A person holding a certificate of registration or license under the laws of another
jurisdiction, including another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District
of Columbia or of any foreign country that is the equivalent of a license as a licensed
clinical, licensed master or licensed social worker under this chapter who meets the
requirements of this chapter, based upon verified evidence may, who has held for at least
2 years a license issued by a board in another jurisdiction for an occupation with a similar
scope of practice to the practice governed by this chapter and who does not have a
complaint, allegation or investigation pending before a board in another jurisdiction that
relates to unprofessional conduct or a crime or a violation of an applicable ethics code or
standard of practice must, upon application, be licensed without further examination. The
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation shall post the information in this
paragraph on its publicly accessible website. The words or similar words: "If you are
licensed in another state or country" must be included in the post.
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §7054-C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 642, §29, is amended to read:
§7054-C. Licensure by endorsement
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, except as otherwise
provided in section 7054-A, the board, in accordance with Title 10, section 8003‑H and
any applicable rules adopted pursuant to that section, shall establish a process to issue a
license by endorsement for each license authorized under this chapter that the board
determines is appropriate for licensure by endorsement. An applicant may submit an
application under the process established under this section or any other licensure process
authorized in this chapter.
Page 1 - 132LR1798(01)

Sec. 5. 32 MRSA §13857, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 542, §1, is
amended to read:
C. An Notwithstanding Title 10, section 8003-H, an applicant who is licensed in good
standing at the time of application to the board under the laws of a jurisdiction that has
not entered into a reciprocal agreement and who does not meet the requirements of
paragraph B may qualify for licensure by submitting evidence satisfactory to the board
that the applicant's qualifications for licensure are substantially similar to those
requirements in this chapter. applicant:
(1) Has held for at least 2 years a license issued by a board in another jurisdiction
for an occupation with a similar scope of practice to the practice governed by this
chapter; and
(2) Does not have a complaint, allegation or investigation pending before a board
in another jurisdiction that relates to unprofessional conduct or a crime or a
violation of an applicable ethics code or standard of practice.
The department shall post the information in this paragraph on its publicly accessible
website. The words or similar words: "If you are licensed in another state or country"
must be included in the post.
Sec. 6. 32 MRSA §13858, first ¶, as amended by PL 2007, c. 402, Pt. EE, §5, is
further amended to read:
To Except as otherwise provided in section 13857, subsection 2, paragraph C, to be
eligible for a license to practice counseling at any level, an applicant must be at least 18
years of age and satisfactorily pass any examination as the board may prescribe by its rules.
Each applicant must demonstrate trustworthiness and competence to engage in the practice
of counseling in such a manner as to safeguard the interests of the public. Each applicant
must submit an application and pay the fee as set under section 13859. The license
categories "licensed clinical professional counselor," "licensed pastoral counselor" and
"licensed marriage and family therapist" are of equivalent clinical status. Clinical status
grants the ability to diagnose and treat mental health disorders.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §13858, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 465, §3, is amended
to read:
The Except as otherwise provided in section 13857, subsection 2, paragraph C, the
following shall must be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that an
applicant is qualified for licensure under this chapter.